Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.233

Student materials—Denial based on protected class prohibited—Complaint procedure.

(1)(a) Except as provided otherwise by this section, a school district board of directors may not refuse to approve, or prohibit the use of, any textbook, instructional material, supplemental instructional material, or other curriculum for student instruction on the basis that it relates to or includes the study of the role and contributions of any individual or group who is part of a protected class as established in RCW 28A.642.010 and 28A.640.010.

(b) Subsection (1)(a) of this section does not apply if the content of the material relating to the role and contributions of an individual or group violates the provisions of chapter 28A.642 or 28A.640 RCW, including materials containing bias against any individual or group who is part of a protected class as established in RCW 28A.642.010 and 28A.640.010.

(2) Anyone alleging a violation of subsection (1) of this section may bring a complaint under the provisions of chapter 28A.642 or 28A.640 RCW. Any school district board of directors found to be in violation of subsection (1) of this section shall be considered to have violated chapter 28A.642 or 28A.640 RCW and is subject to the provisions of that chapter.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "supplemental instructional materials" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.320.235.

(4) This section governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and 28A.715.020 and applies to charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW and state-tribal education compact schools subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW to the same extent as it applies to school districts.

[ 2024 c 316 s 1.]